Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Name

48-246-201. Name.

A foreign LLC name must meet the requirements of § 48-207-101.

A foreign LLC may apply to the office of the secretary of state under § 48-207-101 to utilize a nondistinguishable name.

A foreign LLC may elect to adopt an assumed name under § 48-207-101 and to renew such assumed name.

A foreign LLC may, pursuant to § 48-207-101, cancel an assumed name.

A foreign LLC may, pursuant to § 48-207-102, reserve a name, renew a reserved name and transfer or cancel a reserved name.

A foreign LLC may obtain and retain a registered name by complying with § 48-207-103.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.